Utah statutes.
17B-2a-209.   State land treated the same as private land -- Consent needed
to affect school and institutional trust land -- Owner of state land has same
rights as owner of private land.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a drainage district may treat state land the
same as private land with respect to the drainage of land for agricultural
purposes.
(2)  A drainage district may not affect school or institutional trust land
under this part or Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts,
without the consent of the director of the School and Institutional Trust
Lands Administration acting in accordance with Sections 53C-1-102 and
53C-1-303.
(3)  The state and each person holding unpatented state land under entries or
contracts of purchase from the state have all the rights, privileges, and
benefits under this part and Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local
Districts, that a private owner of that land would have.
